Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 68

Enforcement of Federal Immigration Laws

7-68-101. Legislative findings, determinations and declarations.

The general assembly finds, determines and declares that:

Because the matters contained in this chapter have important statewide ramifications for compliance with and enforcement of federal immigration laws and for the welfare of all citizens in this state, these matters are of statewide concern;

Allowing illegal immigrants to reside within this state undermines federal immigration laws and state laws allocating available resources; and

The state attorney general and reporter and all appropriate state and local law enforcement agencies are to vigorously pursue all federal moneys to which the state may be entitled for the reimbursement of moneys spent to enforce federal immigration laws.

Acts 2009, ch. 447, § 1.

7-68-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Law enforcement agency”:

Means an agency of a political subdivision of this state charged with enforcement of state, county, municipal, or federal laws, or with managing custody of detained persons in this state, and includes, but is not limited to, county and other municipal police departments and sheriffs' departments; and

Includes officials, representatives, agents, and employees of an agency described in subdivision (1)(A);

“Local governmental entity” means a governing body, board, commission, committee, department, or law enforcement agency of a municipality, county, or other political subdivision of this state;

“Official” means an agent, employee, member, or representative of a local governmental entity; and

“Sanctuary policy” means any directive, order, ordinance, resolution, practice, or policy, whether formally enacted, informally adopted, or otherwise effectuated, that:

Limits or prohibits any local governmental entity or official from communicating or cooperating with federal agencies or officials to verify or report the immigration status of any alien;

Grants to aliens unlawfully present in the United States the right to lawful presence within the boundaries of this state in violation of federal law;

Violates 8 U.S.C. § 1373;

Restricts in any way, or imposes any conditions on, a state or local governmental entity's cooperation or compliance with detainers from the United States department of homeland security, or other successor agency, to maintain custody of any alien or to transfer any alien to the custody of the United States department of homeland security, or other successor agency;

Requires the United States department of homeland security, or other successor agency, to obtain a warrant or demonstrate probable cause before complying with detainers from the department to maintain custody of any alien or to transfer any alien to its custody; or

Prevents law enforcement agencies from inquiring as to the citizenship or immigration status of any person.

Acts 2009, ch. 447, § 1; 2018, ch. 973, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 6 provided that (a) The act, which amended this section, shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws regulating immigration, protecting the civil rights of all persons, and respecting the privileges and immunities of United States citizens. (b) ln complying with the requirements of this act, no law enforcement officer shall consider an individual's race, color, or national origin, except to the extent permitted by the United States or Tennessee constitution, and federal law.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the section which read:“As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:“(1) ‘Local governmental entity’ means a governing body, board, commission, committee or department of a municipality or county; and“(2) ‘Official’ means a member of a governing body, board, commission or committee of a municipality or county or the head of any department of a municipality or county.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 7. January 1, 2019.

7-68-103. Adoption of sanctuary policy prohibited.

No local governmental entity or official shall adopt or enact a sanctuary policy. A local governmental entity that adopts or enacts a sanctuary policy is ineligible to enter into any grant contract with the department of economic and community development until the sanctuary policy is repealed, rescinded, or otherwise no longer in effect.

Acts 2009, ch. 447, § 1; 2018, ch. 973, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 6 provided that (a) the act, which amended this section, shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws regulating immigration, protecting the civil rights of all persons, and respecting the privileges and immunities of United States citizens. (b) In complying with the requirements of this act, no law enforcement officer shall consider an individual's race, color, or national origin, except to the extent permitted by the United States or Tennessee constitution, and federal law.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the section which read:“(a) A local governmental entity or official shall not adopt any ordinance or written policy that expressly prohibits a local governmental entity, official or employee from complying with applicable federal law pertaining to persons who reside within the state illegally.“(b) An official shall not materially interfere with the ability of a local governmental entity, official or employee of a municipality or a county to comply with applicable federal law pertaining to persons who reside within the state illegally.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 7. January 1, 2019.

7-68-104. Violations — Filing complaint — Burden of proof — Court actions — Compliance with orders.

A person residing in a municipality or county who believes a local governmental entity or official has violated § 7-68-103 may file a complaint in chancery court in that person's county of residence.

The person filing the complaint shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that a violation of § 7-68-103 has occurred.

If the court finds the local governmental entity or official is in violation of § 7-68-103, the court shall issue a writ of mandamus against the entity or official ordering the entity or official to comply with § 7-68-103, enjoin the entity or official from further interference, and take other action to ensure compliance as is within the jurisdiction of the court.

Upon a finding by the court that a local governmental entity or official has adopted or enacted a sanctuary policy, the local governmental entity, or the entity to which the official belongs, becomes ineligible to enter into any grant contract with the department of economic and community development. Ineligibility commences on the date the court finds that the local governmental entity or official is in violation of § 7-68-103 and continues until such time that the court certifies that the sanctuary policy is repealed, rescinded, or otherwise no longer in effect.

A local governmental entity shall have no less than ninety (90) days nor more than one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of the court's order to comply with the order. If, after one hundred twenty (120) days, the local governmental entity has not complied with the court's order, the court may take whatever action necessary to enforce compliance.

Acts 2009, ch. 447, § 1; 2018, ch. 973, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 6 provided that (a) The act, which amended this section, shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws regulating immigration, protecting the civil rights of all persons, and respecting the privileges and immunities of United States citizens. (b) In complying with the requirements of this act, no law enforcement officer shall consider an individual's race, color, or national origin, except to the extent permitted by the United States or Tennessee constitution, and federal law.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (c)(2), and in present (c)(1), inserted “is” preceding “in violation”, substituted “shall” for “may” preceding “issue”, substituted “entity or official ordering the entity or official” for “local governmental entity of official ordering it” preceding “to comply”, inserted “entity or” following “enjoin the”, and substituted “, and” for “or” following “interference”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 7. January 1, 2019.

7-68-105. Authority to communicate with federal officials regarding immigration status of aliens not lawfully present — Memorandum of agreement between law enforcement agency and federal official — Notice to governor.

All law enforcement agencies and officials are authorized, in accordance with 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g)(10), to communicate with the appropriate federal official regarding the immigration status of any individual, including reporting knowledge that a particular alien is not lawfully present in the United States or otherwise to cooperate with the appropriate federal official in the identification, apprehension, detention, or removal of aliens not lawfully present in the United States.

A law enforcement agency may negotiate the terms of a memorandum of agreement between the law enforcement agency and the appropriate federal official in 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g), concerning the enforcement of federal immigration laws. Any memorandum of agreement negotiated pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) must:

Be entered into in accordance with federal law;

Require that each officer employed by the law enforcement agency be trained in accordance with the memorandum of agreement between the law enforcement agency and the appropriate federal official concerning the law enforcement officer's role in enforcing federal immigration laws, in accordance with 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g); and

Allow for the enforcement of federal immigration laws to the full extent permitted under federal law.

Whenever a law enforcement agency enters into a memorandum of agreement pursuant to subsection (b), notice of the agreement must be submitted in writing to the governor, the office of the lieutenant governor, who shall transmit the notice to the members of the senate, and the office of the speaker of the house of representatives, who shall transmit the notice to the members of the house of representatives.

Any renewal, modification, or termination of a memorandum of agreement must be reported in the same manner as the original memorandum of agreement in subdivision (c)(1).

Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 6 provided that (a) the act, which enacted this section, shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws regulating immigration, protecting the civil rights of all persons, and respecting the privileges and immunities of United States citizens. (b) ln complying with the requirements of this act, no law enforcement officer shall consider an individual's race, color, or national origin, except to the extent permitted by the United States or Tennessee constitution, and federal law.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 973, § 7. January 1, 2019.